Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1344.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XXIX-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is repealed:[ARTICLE XXIX-DCOMPUTER DATA CENTEREQUIPMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAMSUBARTICLE APRELIMINARY PROVISIONS123456789101112131415161718192021222324 Section 2901-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Blockchain." A distributed ledger technology in which the data is:(1) shared across a network that creates a digital ledger of verified transactions or information among network participants; and(2) typically linked using cryptography to maintain the integrity of the digital ledger and execute other functions, including the transfer of ownership or value."Computer data center." All or part of a facility that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that is or will be predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and that may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure."Computer data center equipment." Equipment that is used to outfit, operate or benefit a computer data center and component parts, installations, refreshments, replacements and upgrades to the equipment, whether any of the equipment is affixed to or incorporated into real property, including:(1) All equipment necessary for the transformation, generation, distribution or management of electricity that is required to operate computer servers or similar data storage equipment, including generators, uninterruptible energy supplies, conduit, gaseous fuel piping, cabling, duct banks, switches, switchboards, batteries and testing equipment.(2) All equipment necessary to cool and maintain a 20260SB1344PN1765 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 controlled environment for the operation of the computer servers or data storage systems and other components of the computer data center, including mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, gaseous fuel piping, adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling towers, water softeners, air handling units, indoor direct exchange units, fans, ducting and filters.(3) All water conservation systems, including facilities or mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve and reuse water.(4) All software, including, but not limited to, enabling software and licensing agreements, computer servers or similar data storage equipment, chassis, networking equipment, switches, racks, cabling, trays and conduits.(5) All monitoring equipment and security systems.(6) Modular data centers and preassembled components of any item described in this definition, including components used in the manufacturing of modular data centers.(7) Other tangible personal property that is essential to the operations of a computer data center."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Facility." One or more parcels of land in this Commonwealth and any structures and personal property contained on the land."New investment." Construction, expansion or build out of data center space at either a new or an existing computer data center on or after January 1, 2014, and the purchase and installation of computer data center equipment, except for items described under paragraph (4) of the definition of "computer data center equipment.""Owner or operator." Includes a single entity, multiple 20260SB1344PN1765 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entities or affiliated entities."Proof of work crypto-asset mining." The process of performing computations to add a valid block of data to a blockchain, excluding computations required to validate individual transactions, typically in exchange for a reward or fee."Qualification period." Except as provided under sections 2931-D(d), 2935-D(b) and 2937-D(c), as follows:(1) With respect to the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date of certification of the computer data center and expiring at the end of the fifteenth full calendar year following the calendar year in which the owner or operator filed an application for certification.(2) With respect to a qualified tenant of the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date that the qualified tenant enters into an agreement concerning the use or occupancy of the computer data center and expiring at the earlier of the expiration of the term of the agreement or the end of the 10th full calendar year following the calendar year in which the qualified tenant enters into the agreement."Qualified tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or operator of a computer data center that is certified pursuant to this article to use or occupy part of the computer data center for at least 100 kilowatts per month for two or more years."Tax exemption." The tax exemption provided under Subarticle C."Tax refund." The tax refund provided for under Subarticle 20260SB1344PN1765 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 B."Telecommunications provider." A provider of telecommunications services as defined in 61 Pa. Code § 60.20 (relating to telecommunications service)."Tenant." An entity that contracts with the owner or operator of a computer data center to use or occupy part of the computer data center.SUBARTICLE BSALES AND USE TAX REFUND PROGRAMSection 2911-D. Sales and use tax refund.(a) Application.--Beginning July 1, 2017, an owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this article may apply for a tax refund of taxes paid under Article II upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment for installation in a computer data center, purchased by:(1) An owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article.(2) A qualified tenant certified under this article.(b) Applicability.--Taxes paid under Article II during the qualification period shall be eligible for a refund under this article.(c) Exclusions.--The following do not qualify for a tax refund:(1) Computer data center equipment used by the computer data center to:(i) generate electricity for resale purposes to a power utility, except for sales incidental to the primary sale to computer data centers and which qualify under subparagraph (ii); or20260SB1344PN1765 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) generate, provide or sell more than 5% of its electricity outside of the computer data center.(2) (Reserved).Section 2912-D. Application for certification.To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes the following:(1) The owner's or operator's name, address and telephone number.(2) The address of the site where the facility is or will be located, including, if applicable, information sufficient to identify the specific portion or portions of the facility comprising the computer data center.(3) If the computer data center is to qualify under section 2915-D(1), the following information:(i) The anticipated investment associated with the computer data center for which the certification is being sought.(ii) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed in section 2915-D(1).(4) If the computer data center is to qualify under section 2915-D(2), an affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center has satisfied, or will satisfy, the certification requirements prescribed in section 2915-D(2).(5) The department shall begin accepting applications no 20260SB1344PN1765 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 later than 90 days after the effective date of this section.Section 2913-D. Review of application.(a) General rule.--Within 60 days after receiving a complete and correct application, the department shall review the application and either issue a written certification that the computer data center qualifies for the certification or provide written reasons for its denial.(b) Deemed approval.--Failure of the department to approve or deny an application within 60 days after the date the owner or operator of a computer data center submits the application to the department constitutes certification of the computer data center, and the department shall issue written certification to the owner or operator within 14 days. The department may not certify any computer data center after December 31, 2021.Section 2914-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D.(b) Limitation.--A portion of a facility or an article of computer data equipment shall not be deemed to be a part of more than one computer data center.(c) Aggregation.--An owner or operator may aggregate one or more parcels, buildings or condominiums in a facility into a single computer data center if, in the aggregate, the parcels, buildings and condominiums meet the requirements of this article.Section 2915-D. Eligibility requirements.A computer data center must meet one of the following 20260SB1344PN1765 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements, after taking into account the combined investments made and annual compensation paid by the owner or operator of the computer data center or the qualified tenant:(1) On or before the fourth anniversary of certification, the computer data center creates a minimum investment of:(i) At least $25,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of 250,000 or fewer individuals; or(ii) At least $50,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of more than 250,000 individuals.(2) One or more taxpayers operating or occupying a computer data center, in the aggregate, pay annual compensation of at least $1,000,000 to employees at the certified computer data center site for each year of the certification after the fourth anniversary of certification.Section 2916-D. Notification.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the owner or operator of a computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D.(b) Records.--Until a computer data center satisfies the requirements prescribed in section 2915-D, the owner, operator and qualified tenants shall maintain detailed records of all investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment, and all tax refunds directly received by the owner, operator or qualified 20260SB1344PN1765 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tenant.Section 2917-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2915-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data center.(b) Appeal.--The owner or operator of the computer data center may appeal the revocation. Appeals filed under this section shall be governed by Article II.(c) Recapture.--If certification is revoked pursuant to this section, the qualification period of any owner, operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center expires, and the department may recapture from the owner, operator or qualified tenant all or part of the tax refund provided directly to the owner or operator or qualified tenant. The department may give special consideration or allow a temporary exemption from recapture of the tax refund if there is extraordinary hardship due to factors beyond the control of the owner or operator or qualified tenant.Section 2918-D. Guidelines.The department shall publish guidelines and prescribe forms and procedures as necessary for the purposes of this article.Section 2919-D. Confidential information.Proprietary business information contained in the application form described in section 2912-D and the written notice described in section 2916-D, as well as information concerning the identity of a qualified tenant, are confidential and may not be disclosed to the public. The department may disclose the name of a computer data center that has been certified under this article.20260SB1344PN1765 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2920-D. List of tenants.An owner or operator of a computer data center shall provide, to the extent permissible under Federal law, the department with a list of qualified tenants, including the commencement and expiration dates of each qualified tenant's agreement to use or occupy part of the computer data center. The list shall be provided to the department annually, upon request by the department.Section 2921-D. Sale or transfer.Except as provided in section 2917-D, a computer data center retains its certification regardless of a transfer, sale or other disposition, directly or indirectly, of the computer data center.Section 2922-D. Application.(a) General rule.--An owner, operator or qualified tenant may apply for a tax refund under this article on or before July 30, 2017, and each July 30 thereafter.(b) Notification.--No later than September 30, 2017, and each September 30 thereafter, the department shall notify each applicant of the amount of tax refund approved by the department.Section 2923-D. Limitations.(a) Total.--The total amount of State tax refunds approved by the department under this article shall not exceed $7,000,000 in any fiscal year.(b) Allocation.--If the total amount of tax refunds approved for all applicants exceeds the limitation on the amount of tax refunds in subsection (a) in a fiscal year, the tax refund to be received by each applicant shall be determined as follows:(1) Divide:20260SB1344PN1765 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the tax refund approved for the applicant; by(ii) the total of all tax refunds approved for all applicants.(2) Multiply:(i) the amount under subsection (a); by(ii) the quotient under paragraph (1).(3) The algebraic form of the calculation under this subsection is:Taxpayer's tax refund = amount allocated for those tax refunds X (tax refund approved for the applicant/total of all tax refunds approved for all applicants).Section 2924-D. Applicability.Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the department may not issue a tax refund under this subarticle for the tax imposed upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment purchased after December 31, 2021.SUBARTICLE CSALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION PROGRAMSection 2931-D. Sales and use tax exemption.(a) Sales and use tax.--Beginning January 1, 2022, the tax imposed under Article II shall not be imposed upon the sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment purchased for installation in a certified computer data center, if purchased by any of the following:(1) An owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this subarticle.(2) A qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this subarticle.(b) Applicability.--A tax exemption approved under this 20260SB1344PN1765 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subarticle shall apply during the qualification period as provided under section 2942-D.(c) Exclusions.--The following shall not qualify for a tax exemption:(1) A telecommunications provider's computer data center that does not have retail or wholesale customers being billed or paying for services and does provide a majority of services for internal use or use by the telecommunications provider's subsidiaries.(2) Computer data center equipment used by the certified computer data center for any of the following purposes:(i) Generating electricity for resale purposes to a power utility.(ii) Generating, providing or selling more than 5% of its electricity outside of the certified computer data center.(iii) Proof of work crypto-asset mining.(3) Laptop computers, handheld devices and motor vehicles for use both inside and outside the computer data center.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "qualification period" shall mean the following:(1) With respect to the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this article, a period of time beginning on the date of certification of the computer data center and expiring at the end of the 25th full calendar year following the calendar year in which the owner or operator filed an application for certification.(2) With respect to a qualified tenant of the owner or operator of a computer data center certified under this 20260SB1344PN1765 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article, a period of time beginning on the date that the qualified tenant enters into an agreement concerning the use or occupancy of the computer data center and expiring at the earlier of the expiration of the term of the agreement or the end of the 10th full calendar year following the calendar year in which the qualified tenant enters into the agreement.Section 2932-D. Application for certification.(a) Application.--To be considered for a certification, an owner or operator of a computer data center shall submit to the department an application on a form prescribed by the department that includes all of the following:(1) The owner's or operator's name, address and telephone number.(2) The address of the site where the computer data center is or will be located, including, if applicable, information sufficient to identify the specific portion of a facility comprising the computer data center.(3) An affirmation, signed by an authorized executive representing the owner or operator, that the computer data center is expected to satisfy the certification requirements prescribed under section 2935-D.(b) Acceptance.--The department shall begin accepting applications no later than 60 days after the effective date of this section.(c) Compliance in reporting.--An owner or operator or qualified tenant eligible for a certification shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under this act.(d) Compliance in tax laws.--No owner or operator or qualified tenant may receive a certification under this 20260SB1344PN1765 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subarticle unless that owner or operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with all State tax laws.Section 2933-D. Review of application.(a) General rule.--Within 60 days after receiving a complete and correct application, the department shall review the application and either issue a written certification that the computer data center qualifies for the certification or provide written reasons for its denial.(b) Deemed approval.--Failure of the department to approve or deny an application that has been acknowledged as received by the department within 60 days after the date the owner or operator of a computer data center submits the application to the department shall constitute certification of the computer data center, and the department shall issue written certification to the owner or operator within 14 days.Section 2934-D. Separation of facilities.(a) Separate certification.--An owner or operator of a computer data center may separate a facility into one or more computer data centers, which may each receive a separate certification, if each computer data center individually meets the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D.(b) Limitation.--A portion of a facility or an article of computer data equipment shall not be deemed to be a part of more than one computer data center for certification under this subarticle.(c) Aggregation.--An owner or operator may aggregate one or more parcels, buildings or condominiums in a facility into a single computer data center for certification under this subarticle if, in the aggregate, the parcels, buildings and condominiums meet the requirements prescribed in section 2935-D.20260SB1344PN1765 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2935-D. Eligibility requirements.(a) General rule.--In order to be certified under this subarticle, an owner or operator of a computer data center must meet all of the following requirements:(1) On or before the fourth anniversary of certification, the combined investment, in the aggregate, of the owner or operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center must total a minimum of any of the following:(i) At least $75,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of 250,000 or fewer individuals and creates 25 new jobs.(ii) At least $100,000,000 of new investment if the computer data center is located in a county with a population of more than 250,000 individuals and creates 45 new jobs.(2) On or before the fourth anniversary of certification, the owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center, in the aggregate, must pay annual compensation of at least $1,000,000 to employees at the certified computer data center site for each year of the certification after the fourth anniversary of certification.(b) Prior applications.--A computer data center that has met the eligibility requirements as prescribed under section 2915-D and has, prior to July 1, 2021, been certified under section 2913-D shall be deemed to meet the certification requirements of this section. The certification shall not be revoked, except as provided under section 2917-D, and shall remain in effect for the remainder of the qualification period, as defined in section 2931-D(d).20260SB1344PN1765 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Limitation.--The department may not certify any computer data center under this subarticle after December 31, 2032.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "new investment" means construction, expansion or build out of data center space at either a new or an existing computer data center on or after January 1, 2022, and the purchase and installation of computer data center equipment, except for items described under paragraph (4) of the definition of "computer data center equipment" in section 2901-D.Section 2936-D. Notification and records.(a) Requirements satisfied.--On or before the fourth anniversary of the certification of a computer data center, the owner or operator of the computer data center shall notify the department in writing whether the computer data center for which the certification is requested has satisfied the requirements prescribed under section 2935-D.(b) Records.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant shall:(1) Maintain detailed records of all investments created by the computer data center, including costs of buildings and computer data center equipment and all tax exemptions received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant.(2) Maintain purchase journals for examination by the department.Section 2937-D. Revocation of certification.(a) Revocation.--If the department determines that the requirements of section 2935-D have not been satisfied, the department may revoke the certification of a computer data center.(b) Appeal.--The owner or operator of the computer data 20260SB1344PN1765 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 center may appeal the revocation. Appeals filed under this section shall be governed by Article II.(c) Recapture.--If certification is revoked under this section, the qualification period, as defined in section 2931-D(d), of any owner or operator or qualified tenant of the computer data center shall expire and the department may recapture from the owner or operator or qualified tenant all or part of the tax exemption received by the owner or operator or qualified tenant under section 2942-D. The department may give special consideration or allow a temporary exemption from recapture of the tax exemption if there is extraordinary hardship due to factors beyond the control of the owner or operator or qualified tenant. The department may require the owner or operator or qualified tenant to file appropriate amended tax returns in order to reflect any recapture of the tax exemption.(d) Limitation on assessment.--Notwithstanding the limitation on assessment and collection in section 258, the department shall assess any tax determined not to be properly exempted under this subarticle within five years from the date an owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center purchases property exempt from a tax. A taxpayer may consent to an extension of the period as set forth in section 261.Section 2938-D. Guidelines.The department shall publish guidelines and prescribe forms and procedures as necessary for the purposes of this article.Section 2939-D. Confidential information.Proprietary business information contained in the application form described under section 2932-D and the written notice 20260SB1344PN1765 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 described under section 2936-D, as well as information concerning the identity of a qualified tenant, shall be confidential and may not be disclosed to the public. The department may disclose the name of a computer data center that has been certified under this subarticle.Section 2940-D. List of tenants.An owner or operator of a certified computer data center shall provide, to the extent permissible under Federal law, the department with a list of qualified tenants, including the commencement and expiration dates of each qualified tenant's agreement to use or occupy part of the certified computer data center. The list shall be provided to the department annually, upon request by the department.Section 2941-D. Sale or transfer.Except as provided under section 2937-D, a computer data center retains its certification regardless of a transfer, sale or other disposition, directly or indirectly, of the computer data center.Section 2942-D. Certificate of exemption.(a) General rule.--A qualified owner or operator or qualified tenant of a computer data center certified under this subarticle may submit for a sales and use tax certificate of exemption in a manner prescribed by the department on or before October 1, 2021, and renew each October 1 thereafter. The following shall apply:(1) The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a certified computer data center eligible for a sales and use tax certificate of exemption shall comply with all reporting, filing and compliance requirements under this act.(2) No owner or operator or qualified tenant may receive 20260SB1344PN1765 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a sales and use tax certificate of exemption under this subarticle unless that owner or operator or qualified tenant is in full compliance with all State tax laws.(b) Notification.--No later than 60 days after the submission under subsection (a) for a sales and use tax certificate of exemption, the department shall issue a sales and use tax certificate of exemption to each applicant approved by the department.(c) Exempt purchases.--The owner or operator or qualified tenant of a certified computer data center shall prepare and deliver a properly executed sales and use tax certificate of exemption to a vendor from which the owner or operator or qualified tenant purchases exempt computer data center equipment.]Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3003.26. Transfer of Tax From Certain Sale of Computer Data Equipment.--(a) A restricted account is established within the Motor License Fund which shall be administered as provided in this section.(b) No later than September 30, 2027, and each September 30 thereafter, the Secretary of Revenue shall:(1) Provide the Office of the Budget, the State Treasurer and the General Assembly the total amount of tax collected, during the prior fiscal year, under Article II on a sale at retail or use of computer data center equipment for installation in a computer data center, purchased by an owner or operator of a computer data center or a tenant of a computer data center.(2) Using the amount reported under paragraph (1), calculate a corresponding reduction in the tax rate for the next fiscal year of the oil company franchise tax for highway maintenance 20260SB1344PN1765 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and construction tax imposed by 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax).(3) Report the calculation under paragraph (2) to the General Assembly.(c) No later than ninety days after receipt of the amount provided by the Department of Revenue under subsection (b)(1), the State Treasurer shall transfer the amount from the General Fund to the restricted account established in subsection (a). The money in the restricted account may not be expended unless notice is published as provided in subsection (d).(d) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall prepare a notice of enactment of an act that reduces the tax rate of the oil company franchise tax for highway maintenance and construction tax by at least the reduction reported under subsection (b)(2) and shall transmit the notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall transmit the notice no later than ten days after enactment of the act.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Computer data center." All or part of a facility that may be composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants, that is or will be predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and that may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure."Computer data center equipment." Equipment that is used to outfit, operate or benefit a computer data center and component 20260SB1344PN1765 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parts, installations, refreshments, replacements and upgrades to the equipment, whether any of the equipment is affixed to or incorporated into real property, including:(1) All equipment necessary for the transformation, generation, distribution or management of electricity that is required to operate computer servers or similar data storage equipment, including generators, uninterruptible energy supplies, conduit, gaseous fuel piping, cabling, duct banks, switches, switchboards, batteries and testing equipment.(2) All equipment necessary to cool and maintain a controlled environment for the operation of the computer servers or data storage systems and other components of the computer data center, including mechanical equipment, refrigerant piping, gaseous fuel piping, adiabatic and free cooling systems, cooling towers, water softeners, air handling units, indoor direct exchange units, fans, ducting and filters.(3) All water conservation systems, including facilities or mechanisms that are designed to collect, conserve and reuse water.(4) All software, including, but not limited to, enabling software and licensing agreements, computer servers or similar data storage equipment, chassis, networking equipment, switches, racks, cabling, trays and conduits.(5) All monitoring equipment and security systems.(6) Modular data centers and preassembled components of any item described in this definition, including components used in the manufacturing of modular data centers.(7) Other tangible personal property that is essential to the operations of a computer data center.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1344PN1765 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930